Maine, session 132, LD700.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §10912 is enacted to read:
§10912. Waiver of tuition and fees; Federal Pell Grant-eligible in-state students
1. Eligibility. Beginning with the 2026-2027 academic year, the University of Maine
System shall award a waiver of tuition and fees to an eligible student under this section.
An eligible student must:
A. Be enrolled full-time at any University of Maine System campus, except that a
student may not be a student who has transferred into the University of Maine System
or who is returning to complete a degree;
B. Complete a free application for federal student aid program application, or successor
application, and be eligible for a Federal Pell Grant for the academic year for which
the applicant seeks a waiver;
C. Be a United States citizen or noncitizen who is eligible for a Federal Pell Grant for
the academic year for which the applicant seeks a waiver;
D. Have resided in the State for 12 continuous months before acceptance at the
University of Maine System; and
E. Maintain a cumulative 2.0 grade point average in each academic year.
A University of Maine System campus may establish additional eligibility requirements.
2. Waiver amount. The amount of a waiver of tuition and fees awarded under this
section is limited to the difference between the amount of the tuition and fees at the
University of Maine System campus at which the student is enrolled and the sum of the
amount provided by the Federal Pell Grant and the amount of aid received by the student
from other sources, not including merit-based scholarships awarded to the student by the
University of Maine System.
3. Funding. The availability of a waiver of tuition and fees under this section is limited
to the availability of funds needed to administer the waivers.